Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5147XL (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 1B.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 1B.3 Flags on public buildings. 3 1. As used in this section, âpublic buildingâ means a 4 vertical improvement, as defined in section 15J.2, used for a 5 public purpose by the state or a political subdivision of the 6 state. 7 2. It shall be the duty of any A board of public officers 8 charged with providing supplies for a public building in the 9 state to shall provide a suitable state flag , and it shall be 10 the duty of the custodian of that public building to shall 11 raise the flags of the United States of America and the state 12 of Iowa , upon each secular day when weather conditions are 13 favorable. 14 3. The custodian and the board of public officers of a 15 public building in the state shall have the flags of the United 16 States of America and the state of Iowa flown at half-staff 17 when so directed by a proclamation issued by the governor. 18 4. A person may report an alleged violation of subsection 19 3 to the attorney general. The attorney general may initiate 20 an action in the name of the state, including but not limited 21 to an action for injunctive relief, to obtain compliance with 22 subsection 3. 23